District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-971.04

Real and personal property; nonprofit association as legatee, devisee, or beneficiary.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-231, § 5, 48 DCR 1603
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(r), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-971.04.